Nevada, session 83, SB491.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Training Division of the Department of Public
Safety the sum of $3,293 for the replacement of equipment for
training officers.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 2. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
Highway Fund to the Training Division of the Department of Public
Safety the sum of $3,427 for the replacement of pistols for training
officers.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State Highway
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 3. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Training Division of the Department of Public
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
Safety for the replacement of computer hardware and associated
software the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................... $40,089
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ......................................... $639
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 4. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
Highway Fund to the Training Division of the Department of Public
Safety for the replacement of computer hardware and associated
software the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................... $41,725
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ......................................... $665
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State Highway Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Training Division of the Department of Public
Safety for the replacement of dormitory beds and mattresses the
following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ...................................... $7,739
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ...................................... $7,739
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 6. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
Highway Fund to the Training Division of the Department of Public
Safety for the replacement of dormitory beds and mattresses the
following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ...................................... $8,054
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ...................................... $8,054
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State Highway Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 7. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Training Division of the Department of Public
Safety for building maintenance projects at the training facility in
Carson City the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................... $12,985
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................... $42,042
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 8. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
Highway Fund to the Training Division of the Department of Public
Safety for building maintenance projects at the training facility in
Carson City the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................... $13,515
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................... $43,758
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State Highway Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 9. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Training Division of the Department of Public
Safety for janitorial, landscaping and other maintenance services at
the training facility in Carson City the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ...................................... $6,718
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ...................................... $6,718
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 10. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
Highway Fund to the Training Division of the Department of Public
Safety for janitorial, landscaping and other maintenance services at
the training facility in Carson City the following sums:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ...................................... $6,992
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ...................................... $6,992
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State Highway Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 11. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)